Hawaii statutes.
§502-43 Form when person unknown. When
the person offering the acknowledgment is unknown to the officer taking the
acknowledgment, the certificate may be substantially in the following form,
to-wit:

State of Hawaii ) ss.

County of .........................)

On ............(insert date), personally
appeared before me A.B., satisfactorily proved to me to be the person described
in and who executed the within instrument, by the oath of C.D., a credible
witness for that purpose, to me known and by me duly sworn, and the person,
A.B., acknowledged that the person executed the same freely and voluntarily for
the uses and purposes therein set forth. [L 1872, c 28, §4; RL 1925, §3149; RL
1935, §5135; RL 1945, §12735; RL 1955, §343-27; HRS §502-43; am L 1972, c 125,
§1(c); am L 1992, c 197, §11; am L 2006, c 38, §19]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next